Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20173-126
Aeronautics Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Aeronautics Cash Fund is created. All money received by the division pursuant to the State Aeronautics Act shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund. The division is authorized, whether acting for this state, as the agent of any of its municipalities, or as the agent of any person owning a privately owned public use airport, or when requested by the United States Government or any agency or department thereof, to disburse such money. Any money in the Aeronautics Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. The State Treasurer shall transfer any money in the Department of Aeronautics Cash Fund on July 1, 2017, to the Aeronautics Cash Fund.

Laws 1945, c. 5, § 7(4), p. 88;

Laws 1965, c. 17, § 1, p. 150;

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 32, p. 2360;

Laws 1978, LB 637, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 25;

Laws 1995, LB 609, § 9;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 7;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 24.
July 1, 2017
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.